Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-583
Class V school district; school board; secretary; oath; bond; duties.

The secretary of the school board of a Class V school district shall be present at all meetings of the board, keep an accurate journal of the proceedings, take charge of its books and documents, countersign all warrants for school money drawn upon the treasurer of the school district by order of the board, and perform all other duties the board may require. Before entering into the discharge of his or her duties the secretary of the board shall give bond in the sum of not less than ten thousand dollars, with good and sufficient sureties, and shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation before a proper officer that he or she will support the Constitution of Nebraska and faithfully perform the duties of his or her office.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 11, p. 320;

R.S.1913, § 7019;

C.S.1922, § 6650;

C.S.1929, § 79-2713;

R.S.1943, § 79-2714;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 259, p. 778;

Laws 1951, c. 284, § 1, p. 950;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1004.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 336;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 16.